California, session 20252026, AB753.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California’s early learning and childcare system is currently facing a dire staffing shortage, impacting the availability of quality care for children from birth to five years of age, inclusive.(b) Quality childcare provides a setting where children can engage in educational and social activities that foster cognitive, emotional, and social development. Without these opportunities, children may miss out on critical learning experiences that prepare them for school and life.(c) When families cannot access childcare, their economic mobility is often limited.(d) Given the demographics of the families who primarily utilize these services, a lack of early learning and childcare services can exacerbate the existing opportunity and achievement gap.(e) Eradicating barriers for Californians to enter the early learning and childcare profession is important for families, children, and the economy. Therefore, this measure is necessary to address the system’s dire staffing crisis that limits options for working families.SEC. 2. Section 8231.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:8231.5. (a) The Superintendent may require a contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 to provide the department with data that includes the number of employees in its program who hold an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 or who qualified for waivers pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8298. The data may be collected by survey or by another collection method. The data shall be provided to the department as part of the contracting agency’s annual plan for its program self-evaluation process as required by Section 17709 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or a successor statute or regulation, or as part of an existing reporting process determined by the Superintendent.(b) Notwithstanding Section 33308.5 of this code and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Superintendent may develop informal directives and bulletins to implement this section.SEC. 3. Section 8301.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:8301.1. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 8295 and 8301, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may issue an assistant teacher permit that authorizes the permitholder to assist in the care, development, and instruction of children, subject to the supervision requirements described in subdivision (b). This assistance may include temporarily supervising children independently for no more than 120 minutes per day while the supervising employee leaves the classroom for purposes of offering flexibility for classroom support, during breaks, or escorting children outside of the classroom. The commission may issue a permit under this section provided that all of the following requirements are met:(1) The applicant has at least six units from an accredited institution of higher education in early childhood education, child development, or human development, or a combination thereof.(2) The applicant has an education plan updated each academic year and is enrolled in a course or courses to meet the requirements for the next level permit.(3) The applicant is sponsored by an employer who has a current contract with the State Department of Education to be a California state preschool program provider.(b) An employee who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be under the supervision of an employee who holds a valid commission-issued child development permit at the teacher level, or at an equivalent or higher permit level.(c) A contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall maintain a copy of the permitholder’s current education plan in their employee file.(d) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for no more than two years from the date of issuance and shall not be renewed.(e) The number of assistant teacher permitholders employed by a contracting agency at one site shall not exceed 50 percent of the number of classrooms at that site. The contracting agency shall not assign more than one assistant teacher to each classroom.(f) This section shall not be construed to grant to a person issued with an assistant teacher permit pursuant to this section with the rights and responsibilities of an associate teacher permitholder, or equivalent permitholder, or higher permitholder.(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of management bulletins or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.(h) The commission shall implement this section by no later than January 30, 2026.(i) This section shall become inoperative one year after the implementation of the commission’s revised child development permit matrix, or January 1, 2029, whichever is later, and, as of that date, is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 10267.6 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10267.6. (a) The director may require a contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 to provide the department with data that includes the number of employees in its program who hold an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 or who qualified for waivers pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10242. The data may be collected by survey or by another collection method. The data shall be provided to the department as part the contracting agency’s annual plan for its program self-evaluation process as required by Section 17709 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or a successor statute or regulation, or as part of an existing reporting process determined by the director.(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may develop informal directives and bulletins to implement this section.SEC. 5. Section 10383.1 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10383.1. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 10380 and 10383, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may issue an assistant teacher permit that authorizes the permitholder to assist in the care, development, and instruction of children, subject to the supervision requirements described in subdivision (b). This assistance may include temporarily supervising children independently for no more than 120 minutes per day while the supervising employee leaves the classroom for purposes of offering flexibility for classroom support, during breaks, or escorting children outside of the classroom. The commission may issue a permit under this section provided that all of the following requirements are met:(1) The applicant has at least six units from an accredited institution of higher education in early childhood education, child development, or human development, or a combination thereof.(2) The applicant has an education plan updated each academic year and is enrolled in a course or courses to meet the requirements for the next level permit.(3) The applicant is sponsored by an employer who has a current contract with the State Department of Social Services to be a child development program provider.(b) An employee who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be under the supervision of an employee who holds a valid commission-issued child development permit at the teacher level, or at an equivalent or higher permit level.(c) A contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall maintain a copy of the permitholder’s current education plan in their employee file.(d) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for no more than two years from the date of issuance and shall not be renewed.(e) The number of assistant teacher permitholders employed by a contracting agency at one site shall not exceed 50 percent of the number of classrooms at that site. The contracting agency shall not assign more than one assistant teacher to each classroom.(f) This section shall not be construed to grant to a person issued with an assistant teacher permit pursuant to this section with the rights and responsibilities of an associate teacher permitholder, or equivalent permitholder, or higher permitholder.(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of childcare bulletins or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.(h) The commission shall implement this section by no later than January 30, 2026.(i) This section shall become inoperative one year after the implementation of the commission’s revised child development permit matrix, or January 1, 2029, whichever is later, and, as of that date, is repealed.SEC. 6. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To address the dire staffing shortage faced by California’s early learning and childcare system, it is necessary for this act to take immediate effect.